Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1982 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1982, 1987, 1992, 1996, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor word changes.

Administrative Code. —

For education and early development, see 4 AAC.

Collateral references. —

James A. Rapp, Education Law (Matthew Bender).